Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2260.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.02, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3034.02, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.02. Arizona state veterinary medical examining board; termination July 1, 2034 A. The arizona state veterinary medical examining board terminates on July 1, 2034. b. Title 32, chapter 21 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona state veterinary medical examining board to promote the safe and professional practice of veterinary medicine. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.